Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-109
Sirens; restriction on use.

No siren or other similar device whose primary purpose is to warn the public of a natural or manmade emergency or disaster shall be used to notify volunteer firefighters of a fire or to summon volunteer firefighters to a fire. This section applies only to cities of the first class located within a county which contains a city of the metropolitan class.

Laws 1997, LB 589, § 3.